Georgia, session 2025_26, HB218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 31-7-18 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to vaccinations for
influenza and pneumococcal disease for certain discharged patients, vaccinations or other
measures for health care workers and other employees in hospitals, immunity from liability,
and standing orders, is amended by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) Prior to discharging any inpatient who is 50 18 years of age or older, a hospital shall
offer the inpatient a vaccination for the influenza virus. Prior to discharging any inpatient
who is 65 years of age or older, a hospital shall offer the inpatient a vaccination for
pneumococcal disease. Such vaccinations shall be provided in accordance with the
H. B. 218
- 1 -

LC 46 1009
recommendations of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and any
applicable rules and regulations of the department, unless contraindicated, and contingent
on availability of such vaccine. A hospital may offer other patients such vaccinations in
accordance with the recommendations of the federal Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention and any applicable rules and regulations of the department. The vaccinations
may be administered pursuant to a standing order that has been approved by the hospital's
medical staff."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 218
- 2 -